New Jersey, session 221, S1564.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 76 of P.L.1975, c.291 (C.40:55D-89) is amended to read as follows: 76.  Periodic examination. The governing body shall, at least every 10 years, provide for a general reexamination of its master plan and development regulations by the planning board, which shall prepare and adopt by resolution a report on the findings of such reexamination, a copy of which report and resolution shall be sent to the Office of Planning Advocacy and the county planning board.  A notice that the report and resolution have been prepared shall be sent to any military facility commander who has registered with the municipality pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2005, c.41 (C.40:55D-12.4) and to the municipal clerk of each adjoining municipality, who may request a copy of the report and resolution on behalf of the military facility or municipality.  A reexamination shall be completed at least once every 10 years from the previous reexamination. The reexamination report shall state: a.     The major problems and objectives relating to land development in the municipality at the time of the adoption of the last reexamination report. b.    The extent to which such problems and objectives have been reduced or have increased subsequent to such date. c.     The extent to which there have been significant changes in the assumptions, policies, and objectives forming the basis for the master plan or development regulations as last revised, with particular regard to the density and distribution of population and land uses, housing conditions, circulation, conservation of natural resources, energy conservation, collection, disposition, and recycling of designated recyclable materials, and changes in State, county and municipal policies and objectives. d.    The specific changes recommended for the master plan or development regulations, if any, including underlying objectives, policies and standards, or whether a new plan or regulations should be prepared. e.     The recommendations of the planning board concerning the incorporation of redevelopment plans adopted pursuant to the "Local Redevelopment and Housing Law," P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-1 et al.) into the land use plan element of the municipal master plan, and recommended changes, if any, in the local development regulations necessary to effectuate the redevelopment plans of the municipality. f.     The recommendations of the planning board concerning locations appropriate for the development of public electric vehicle infrastructure, including but not limited to, commercial districts, areas proximate to public transportation and transit facilities and transportation corridors, and public rest stops; and recommended changes, if any, in the local development regulations necessary or appropriate for the development of public electric vehicle infrastructure. g.    The recommendations of the planning board concerning locations appropriate for the development of warehouses shall be consistent and compatible with the State Development and Redevelopment Plan adopted pursuant to the "State Planning Act," sections 1 through 12 of P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.), and with the most recent warehouse siting guidance policy adopted by the State Planning Commission. (cf: P.L.2019, c.267, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment and shall be applicable to planning board resolutions adopting a reexamination report on and after that date. STATEMENT The development of industrial-scale warehousing for goods storage and distribution has undergone rapid change in recent years, which has caused the State Planning Commission to adopt Distribution Warehousing and Goods Movement Guidelines for the purpose of providing municipalities with guidance to follow in the siting of warehouses. Previous warehouse types used to be a less conspicuous land use, often limited to industrial parks in peripheral areas.  Distribution warehouses that are being developed currently are significantly larger than previous warehouse types, and their development has often imposed detrimental externalities on adjacent municipalities and residential neighborhoods.  While recognizing that the development of distribution warehouses is of Statewide economic importance, the State will benefit from greater consistency and coordination in the decision-making that leads to warehouse development approvals. Under current law, every planning board that has adopted a master plan is required to reexamine its master plan at least every 10 years.  This bill would require each planning boards reexamination report to set forth the planning boards recommendations concerning locations appropriate for the development of warehouses, and would require the recommendations to be consistent and compatible with the State Development and Redevelopment Plan, and with the most recent warehouse siting guidance policy adopted by the State Planning Commission.